District of Columbia statutes.
16-3712

Verdict where goods are eloigned.

If the defendant in an action of replevin has eloigned the things sued for, the court may instruct the jury, if they find for the plaintiff, to assess such damages as may compel the defendant to return the things.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 606, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-3712.
1973 Ed., § 16-3712.